Utah statutes.
17-27a-803.   Penalties.

(1)  The county may, by ordinance, establish civil penalties for violations of any of the provisions of this chapter or of any ordinances adopted under the authority of this chapter.

(2)  Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or of any ordinances adopted under the authority of this chapter is punishable as a class C misdemeanor upon conviction either:

(a)  as a class C misdemeanor; or

(b)  by imposing the appropriate civil penalty adopted under the authority of this section.

